Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 18 Bank Branches, Offices, Facilities, and Holding Companies

Administrative rules and regulations.

Applications, registrations, and notifications, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-1-1.

Holding companies, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-6-1.

7-1-600.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Bank” means any moneyed corporation authorized by law to receive deposits of money and commercial paper, to make loans, to discount bills, notes, and other commercial paper, to buy and sell bills of exchange, and to issue bills, notes, acceptances, or other evidences of debt, and shall include incorporated banks, savings banks, banking companies, trust companies, and other corporations doing a banking business and may include corporations who provide some or all of the financial services listed in this paragraph by technological means in lieu of or in addition to traditional geographically based delivery systems but, unless the context otherwise indicates, shall not include national banks or similar corporations. Such term shall include “main office” and any “branch office,” unless the context indicates that it does not.

“Bank holding company” means “bank holding company” as defined in Code Section 7-1-605.

“Banking office” or “banking location” means either a main office or a branch office.

“Banking services” shall include all those offerings or services resulting from the exercise of banking powers as granted to banks in this title or by other applicable federal or state law or regulation.

“Branch office” means any location of a bank other than the main office where banking services are offered to the public. It does not include a representative office as defined in Code Section 7-1-590 or a bank extension as defined in Code Section 7-1-603. The department may provide by regulation that certain other activities do or do not constitute the formation of a branch office.

“Main office” means the principal banking location of a bank as such location appears in the records of the department. A bank shall indicate its principal banking location with the department, and if it fails to do so, the department shall choose a banking location of such bank to be the main office and shall so notify such bank.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 1, § 1; Ga. L. 1925, p. 119, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-201; Ga. L. 1960, p. 67, § 2; Code 1933, § 13-201.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1960, p. 67, § 3; Ga. L. 1963, p. 602, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 954, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 168, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 458, § 8; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 20; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 17; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-12/HB 811.

Cross references.

Applicability of “bank office” and “bank facility” definitions to definitions of “bank” and “branch” in the UCC, § 11-1-201(4).

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of business associations, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 85 (1991).

7-1-601.
Branch offices.

Branch offices may be established by banks doing a lawful banking business in Georgia with the prior approval of the department as follows:

New or additional branch offices may be established de novo in the manner provided in Code Section 7-1-602;

New or additional branch offices may be established through merger, share exchange, consolidation, or sale of assets pursuant to Part 14, 15, 16, 19, or 20 of this article;

A bank may acquire a branch office from another bank without acquisition of the entire bank; or

A bank with two or more existing banking offices in Georgia may redesignate its existing main office as a branch office in accordance with the procedures established by the department.

A bank not doing a lawful banking business in Georgia may become the owner of a branch office in Georgia provided such transaction is consummated under Section 12 or 13 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 1811, et seq., as amended.

Taxation of all banks shall be in the manner provided in Chapter 6 of Title 48.

Each branch office will operate under the control and direction of the board of directors and executive officers of the bank, and the bank shall be responsible for adequately staffing the branch office to conduct the business of the branch office in accordance with this chapter, federal law, and the rules and regulations of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 1, § 3; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 195, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-203; Ga. L. 1960, p. 67, § 4; Ga. L. 1970, p. 954, § 3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 474, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1710, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, § 9; Ga. L. 1996, p. 181, § 9; Ga. L. 1996, p. 642, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 10; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 17; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 13/SB 70; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-12/HB 811.

Cross references.

Status of branch or separate office of bank for purpose of computing time within which and determining place at or to which action may be taken or notices or orders given under the Commercial Code, §

11-4-106

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “Part” was substituted for “Parts” in paragraph (a)(2).

Law reviews.

For comment on United States v. Citizens & S. Nat’l Bank, 422 U.S. 86,

95 S. Ct. 2099

,

45 L. Ed. 2

d 41 (1975), see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 641 (1976).

For article discussing compliance with Federal Securities Act of 1933 in bank acquisitions and the issuance of securities of bank holding companies, see 14 Ga. St. B.J. 114 (1978).

For review of 1996 banking and finance legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1996).

For review of 1996 revenue and taxation legislation, see 13 Ga. U.L. Rev. 294 (1996).

7-1-602.
Applications for branch offices.

Application to establish a branch office shall be made to the department in such form as it may prescribe from time to time. The department shall exercise its discretion in its consideration of the application; but the department shall not approve the application until it has ascertained to its satisfaction that the public need and advantage will be promoted by the establishment of the proposed branch office, based upon the following factors:

Reasonable opportunity for the proposed branch office to generate a sufficient profit;

The character and fitness of the board of directors and management of the bank to command the confidence of the community and to warrant the belief that the business of the bank or trust company at the branch office will be honestly and efficiently conducted;

The adequacy of the capital structure of the bank or trust company, particularly in view of the anticipated business to be generated by the proposed branch office; and

The overall financial condition and safety and soundness of the applicant bank or trust company.

Where the department by rule, regulation, or written policy has provided for expedited processing of applications or for notice procedures, it may abbreviate its review of these criteria.

After receipt of a complete application, the department shall have 30 days within which to approve or disapprove such application.

The department may approve an application contingent upon the satisfaction of additional conditions, including the submission of information such as the date of opening and the capital outlay for the branch office. If the approval of a federal regulatory agency is required with respect to the branch office, the department may at its option withhold its written approval or disapproval until such federal approval is granted or denied or may withdraw its approval if the federal agency fails to act or refuses to grant approval. If the department disapproves the branch office, it shall notify the applicant of its disapproval and state generally in writing the unfavorable factors influencing its decision. The decision of the department is final, except that it may be subject to judicial review as provided in Code Section 7-1-90.

The department may provide by regulation that a bank which meets certain financial and managerial criteria may, in lieu of application, file a written notification with the department at a time to be specified in such regulation.

All lawfully established banking locations existing on July 1, 1999, other than a bank’s main office, shall be known and shall qualify as branch offices.

In the event of merger or consolidation of two or more banks, pursuant to Parts 14 and 15 of this article, the surviving or resulting bank shall designate a main office and may retain and continue to operate any or all banking locations of each constituent bank as branch offices. In the event of the purchase of substantially all of the assets of a bank, subject to the review and approval by the commissioner of such transaction, the purchasing bank may retain and continue to operate any or all banking locations of the selling bank as branch offices.

The department’s approval may be revoked if conditions in the approval have not been satisfied or if other violations of law occur as a result of the branch office’s opening or operation.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-203.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1960, p. 67, § 5; Ga. L. 1963, p. 602, § 2; Ga. L. 1970, p. 954, § 4; Ga. L. 1973, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 473, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1710, § 3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2068, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1082, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 14; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 17; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 13; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-13/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 7/HB 781.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “30 days” for “90 days” in subsection (b); inserted a comma in the first sentence of subsection (c); deleted the former last sentence in subsection (d), which read: “The department may waive publication requirements for such a procedure.”; and, in subsection (f), deleted “so long as they are consistent with and authorized by this part” following “offices” at the end of the first and last sentences.

Law reviews.

For comment on United States v. Citizens & S. Nat’l Bank, 422 U.S. 86,

95 S. Ct. 2099

,

45 L. Ed. 2

d 41 (1975), see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 641 (1976).

For article discussing compliance with Federal Securities Act of 1933 in bank acquisitions and the issuance of securities of bank holding companies, see 14 Ga. St. B.J. 114 (1978).

For annual survey of law of business associations, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 85 (1991).

7-1-603.
Extension of existing banking locations; automated teller machines, cash dispensing machines, point-of-sale terminals, and other extensions.

An approved banking location may have an extension, which is not a branch or main office, at which banking activities may occur. The extensions described in this Code section do not require approval but may have certain restrictions or required notifications.

The following are extensions:

“Automated teller machine” means electronic equipment which performs routine banking transactions, including, but not limited to, the taking of deposits for the public at locations off premises of a bank’s main or branch office under regulations prescribed by the commissioner. This term includes electronic equipment that utilizes, or has the capability to utilize, live video chat with offsite bank personnel who may assist with banking services, including, but not limited to, account initiation.

“Cash dispensing machine” means for the purposes of this part and as used in paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-241 an automated or electronic terminal which dispenses cash or scrip redeemable for goods and services or for cash, goods, and services. Such machines may provide account information but may not initiate intrabank transactions other than those necessary and incidental to the dispensing of cash.

“Night depository” means a drop box where customers can make deposits or payments outside of normal banking hours.

“Point-of-sale terminal” means electronic equipment located in nonbank business outlets to record electronically bank transactions occurring as a result of the sale of goods or services.

For purposes of this Code section, the terms “automated teller machine,” “point-of-sale terminal,” “cash dispensing machine,” and “night depository” shall not include personal communication devices such as telephones, computer terminals, modems, and other similar devices which are not accessible to the general public but are intended for use by a single bank customer. It is not the intent of this Code section to limit the ability of banks or other entities to utilize personal communication devices. The department may by regulation further define “automated teller machine,” “point-of-sale terminal,” “cash dispensing machine,” “night depository,” and “personal communication device” consistent with the objectives set forth in Code Section 7-1-3.

The following are restrictions on location of an extension:

Any federally insured bank may operate automated teller machines throughout the state. These machines may be operated individually by any bank or jointly on a cost-sharing basis by two or more banks;

Any bank may operate cash dispensing machines throughout the state. Access to and use of cash dispensing machines may be available to all banks in this state on an individual or a shared basis;

A night depository may be located anywhere in the state; and

A point-of-sale terminal may be located anywhere in the state.

An extension not defined in subsection (b) of this Code section is permitted, provided that such extension is located within the boundary lines of a single contiguous area of property owned or leased by the bank and used as a banking location, or if it is within 200 yards of such banking location. Banking services may be performed at the extension. Written notification to the department is required for such extension.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-203.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 526, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 475, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 24; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 21; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 17; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-14/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 7/HB 323; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 8/HB 781.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (b), added paragraph (b)(3), redesignated former paragraph (b)(3) as present paragraph (b)(4), and in the ending paragraph, substituted “ ‘cash dispensing machine,’ and ‘night depository’ ” for “and ‘cash dispensing machine’ ” in the first sentence and inserted “ ‘night depository,’ ” in the last sentence; in subsection (c), in paragraph (c)(1), deleted “or credit union” following “bank” twice, substituted “the state” for “this state” in the first sentence, and deleted “or credit unions” following “banks” at the end of the second sentence, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (c)(2), added paragraph (c)(3), and redesignated former paragraph (c)(3) as present paragraph (c)(4); and inserted “of this Code section” in the first sentence of subsection (d).

7-1-604.
Banking business prohibited except as allowed by Title 7 or applicable federal law.

No bank shall carry on or conduct or do a banking business in this state except in accordance with the provisions of this title or federal law directly applicable to the bank. A “banking business” is the business which a bank is authorized to do pursuant to this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-204.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 105, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 954, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 17; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-15/HB 811.

7-1-605.
Bank holding companies — Definitions; when company deemed to control shares.

Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, “bank holding company” means any company which has control over any bank or over any company that is or becomes a bank holding company by virtue of this part.

Any company has “control” over a bank or over any company if:

The company directly or indirectly or acting through one or more other persons owns, controls, or has power to vote 25 percent or more of any class of voting securities of the bank or company;

The company controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors or trustees of the bank or company;

The commissioner determines, after notice and opportunity for hearing, that the company directly or indirectly exercises a controlling influence over the management or policies of the bank or company; or

The company directly or indirectly owns, controls, or has power to vote more than 10 percent but less than 25 percent of any class of voting securities of the bank or company if no other company or person will own, control, or hold the power to vote a greater percentage of that class of voting securities immediately after the transaction.

For the purposes of any proceeding under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of this subsection, there is a presumption that any company which directly or indirectly owns, controls, or has power to vote less than 5 percent of any class of voting securities of a given bank or company does not have control over that bank or company.

In any administrative or judicial proceeding under this part, other than a proceeding under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of this subsection, a company may not be held to have had control over any given bank or company at any given time unless that company, at the time in question, directly or indirectly owned, controlled, or had power to vote 5 percent or more of any class of voting securities of the bank or company, or had already been found to have control in a proceeding under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of this subsection.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection:

No bank and no company owning or controlling voting shares of a bank is a bank holding company by virtue of its ownership or control of shares in a fiduciary capacity, except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (c) of this Code section. For the purpose of the preceding sentence, bank shares shall not be deemed to have been acquired in a fiduciary capacity if the acquiring bank or company has sole discretionary authority to exercise voting rights with respect thereto; and

No company is a bank holding company by virtue of its ownership or control of shares acquired in securing or collecting a debt previously contracted in good faith until two years after the date of acquisition.

For the purposes of this part, any successor to a bank holding company shall be deemed to be a bank holding company from the date on which the predecessor company became a bank holding company.

As used in this Code section and in Code Sections 7-1-606 through 7-1-608, the term:

“Bank” means the same as defined in Code Section 7-1-600.

“Company” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, business trust, association, commercial entity regardless of organizational structure, or any other trust unless by its terms it must terminate within 25 years or not later than 21 years and ten months after the death of individuals living on the effective date of the trust, but shall not include any corporation the majority of the shares of which are owned by the United States or by any state or any qualified family partnership as defined in the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended.

The “Georgia Bank Holding Company Act” shall mean and include this Code section and Code Sections 7-1-606 through 7-1-608 together with Part 19 of this article and any applicable rules and regulations.

“Subsidiary,” with respect to a specified bank holding company, means:

Any company 25 percent or more of whose voting shares (excluding shares owned by the United States or by any company wholly owned by the United States) is directly or indirectly owned or controlled by such bank holding company or is held by it with power to vote;

Any company the election of a majority of whose directors is controlled in any manner by such bank holding company; or

Any company with respect to the management or policies of which such bank holding company has the power, directly or indirectly, to exercise a controlling influence, as determined by the commissioner after notice and opportunity for hearing.

“Successor” shall include any company which acquires directly or indirectly from a bank holding company shares of any bank, when and if the relationship between such company and the bank holding company is such that the transaction effects no substantial change in the control of the bank or beneficial ownership of such shares of such bank. The commissioner may, by regulation, further define the term “successor” to the extent necessary to prevent evasion of the purposes of this part.

For the purposes of this part:

Shares owned or controlled by any subsidiary of a bank holding company shall be deemed to be indirectly owned or controlled by such bank holding company;

Shares held or controlled directly or indirectly by trustees for the benefit of:

A company;

The shareholders or members of a company; or

The employees (whether exclusively or not) of a company;

shall be deemed to be controlled by such company; and

Shares transferred by any bank holding company (or by the company which, but for such transfer, would be a bank holding company) directly or indirectly to any transferee that is indebted to the transferor, or has one or more officers, directors, trustees, or beneficiaries in common with or subject to control by the transferor, shall be deemed to be indirectly owned or controlled by the transferor unless the commissioner, after opportunity for hearing, determines that the transferor is not in fact capable of controlling the transferee.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-207, enacted by Ga. L. 1960, p. 67, § 6; Ga. L. 1973, p. 281, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 168, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 26; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 17; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-13/HB 811; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 15/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “or” from the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(B), substituted “; or” for a period at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(C), added subparagraph (a)(2)(D), deleted “, except that this limitation is applicable in the case of a bank or company acquiring such shares prior to July 1, 1976, only if the bank or company has the right, consistent with its obligations under the instrument, agreement, or other arrangement establishing the fiduciary relationship, to divest itself of such voting rights and fails to exercise that right to divest within a reasonable period not to exceed one year after July 1, 1976” following “thereto” in subparagraph (a)(5)(A); and deleted “after July 1, 1976,” following “Shares transferred” in paragraph (c)(3).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, in subsection (a), “subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2)” was substituted for “subparagraph (2)(C)” in paragraphs (a)(3) and (a)(4).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “this Code section and
Code Sections 7-1-606 through
7-1-608” was substituted for “ Code Sections 7-1-605 through
7-1-608” in paragraph (b)(3).

Law reviews.

For comment on United States v. Citizens & S. Nat’l Bank, 422 U.S. 86,

95 S. Ct. 2099

,

45 L. Ed. 2

d 41 (1975), see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 641 (1976).

For article, “Bank Directors: Understanding Their Role, Responsibility and Liability,” see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 587 (1989).

7-1-606.
Bank holding companies — Actions unlawful without prior approval of commissioner; exceptions.

It shall be unlawful, except with the prior approval of the commissioner:

For any action to be taken that causes any company to become a bank holding company;

For any action to be taken that causes a bank to become a subsidiary of a bank holding company;

For any bank holding company to acquire direct or indirect ownership or control of any voting shares of any bank if, after such acquisition, such company will directly or indirectly own or control 5 percent or more of the voting shares of such bank;

For any bank holding company or subsidiary thereof, other than a bank, to acquire all or substantially all of the assets of a bank;

For any bank holding company to merge or consolidate with, or enter into a share exchange with, any other bank holding company; or

For any bank holding company to take any action which would violate the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended.

Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, these prohibitions shall not apply to:

Shares acquired by a bank:

In good faith in a fiduciary capacity, except where such shares are held under a trust that constitutes a company as defined in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-605 and except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (c) of Code Section 7-1-605; or

In the regular course of securing or collecting a debt previously contracted in good faith, but such shares in securing or collecting any such previously contracted debt shall be disposed of within a period of two years from the date on which they were acquired;

Additional shares acquired by a bank holding company in a bank in which such bank holding company owned or controlled a majority of the voting shares prior to such acquisition;

A bank holding company of a national bank with its main office in Georgia acquiring a Georgia bank holding company, as such term is defined in paragraph (10) of Code Section 7-1-621, shall notify the department upon filing an application with the appropriate federal or state financial regulator. The notification requirements of this subparagraph shall be satisfied by furnishing the department with a copy of the application or applications filed with applicable bank supervisory agencies seeking approval for the proposed transaction and such other information as the department may request. In addition, the parties shall file with the department and the Secretary of State a certificate of approval of the acquisition by the appropriate supervisory agencies prior to consummation of the transaction. The department may, for good cause shown, object to the transaction by letter to the bank holding company of a national bank with its main office in Georgia, the Georgia bank holding company, and to the appropriate federal or state financial regulator before consummation of the transaction. In the event of such objection, the acquisition cannot be consummated without the parties obtaining the approval of the department; or

Transactions for which the department has established by rule, regulation, or written policy a streamlined or alternative procedure, if such procedure specifically dispenses with the need for approval by the commissioner.

For the purpose of this paragraph, bank shares shall not be deemed to have been acquired in good faith in a fiduciary capacity if the acquiring bank or company has sole discretionary authority to exercise voting rights with respect thereto; but, in such instances, acquisitions may be made without prior approval of the commissioner if the commissioner, upon application filed within 90 days after the shares are acquired, approves retention or, if retention is disapproved, the acquiring bank disposes of the shares or its sole discretionary voting rights within two years after issuance of the order of disapproval.

The commissioner shall not approve nor shall any other procedure authorize:

In every case, the department shall take into consideration the financial and managerial resources and future prospects of the company or companies and the banks concerned.

Reserved.

The commissioner shall not grant any such contemplated approval until he or she shall first cause reasonable public notice of the proposed action to be given in the area to be affected and until he or she shall first afford to the public an opportunity to submit, for the commissioner’s consideration, information, objections, and opinions as to the proposed action and its effect. The notice requirement may not apply in the case of a streamlined procedure where the holding company meets certain qualifying criteria established by rule, regulation, or written policy of the department.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part, a bank holding company which lawfully controls a bank or has received the requisite approvals under this Code section to acquire control of a bank may, with the approval of the commissioner, or as otherwise provided in this chapter or by departmental rule or regulation, either at the time such control is obtained or at any time thereafter, merge or consolidate such bank with another of such bank holding company’s banking subsidiaries or have another of such bank holding company’s banking subsidiaries acquire all or substantially all of the assets of such bank and consequently operate as a branch office of such other banking subsidiary. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to supersede, rescind, or modify any provision, requirement, or condition of this Code section which would otherwise be applicable to any acquisition of a banking subsidiary by a bank holding company under this Code section, nor shall it be deemed to supersede, rescind, or modify any provision, requirement, or condition of Part 14, 16, 19, or 20 of this article which would otherwise be applicable to the merger of banks or the acquisition or sale of all or substantially all of the assets of a bank.

(A)

Any acquisition or merger or share exchange or consolidation under this Code section which would result in a monopoly or which would be in furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to monopolize or to attempt to monopolize the business of banking in any part of the State of Georgia; or

(B)

Any other proposed acquisition or merger or share exchange or consolidation under this Code section whose effect in any section of the state may be substantially to lessen competition, or to tend to create a monopoly, or which in any other manner would be in restraint of trade, unless it finds that the anticompetitive effects of the proposed transaction are clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the transaction in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-207.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 168, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 542, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1506, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 27; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 17; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 14/SB 70; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 16/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “It” for “On and after July 1, 1976, it” at the beginning of the introductory language of paragraph (a)(1), substituted “these prohibitions” for “this prohibition” in the introductory language of paragraph (a)(2), substituted “such shares” for “any shares acquired after July 1, 1976,” in division (a)(2)(A)(ii), deleted “or” from the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(B), added subparagraph (a)(2)(C), redesignated former subparagraph (a)(2)(C) as subparagraph (a)(2)(D); deleted “and the convenience and needs of the community to be served” from the end of paragraph (b)(2); substituted “Reserved” for “Nothing contained in this Code section shall affect the obligation of any person or company to comply with the provisions of any order of any court or of the commissioner entered prior to July 1, 1976” in subsection (c); and substituted “Part 14, 16,” for “Part 14, 15, 16” in the last sentence in subsection (e).

U.S. Code.

The federal Bank Holding Company Act, referred to in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of this Code section, is codified as

12 U.S.C. § 1841

et seq.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of business associations, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 85 (1991).

7-1-607.
Bank holding companies that control a bank — Registration, reporting, examinations, and control.

On an annual basis, each bank holding company that controls a bank chartered by the department shall register with the commissioner on forms provided or prescribed by him or her, which may include such information with respect to the financial condition, operation, management, and intercompany relationships of the bank holding company and its subsidiaries and related matters as the commissioner may deem necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this part.

The commissioner is authorized to issue such regulations and orders as may be necessary to enable him or her to administer and carry out the purposes of this Code section.

The commissioner from time to time may require reports under oath to keep him or her informed as to whether the provisions of this Code section and such regulations and orders thereunder issued by him or her have been complied with; may make examinations of each bank holding company and each subsidiary thereof, the cost of which may be assessed against and paid by such holding company; and shall, as far as possible, use the reports of examination made by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System for the purposes of this Code section.

Bank holding companies that control a bank chartered by the department and subsidiaries or affiliates thereof shall be regulated, controlled, and examined by the commissioner to the same extent that he or she regulates, controls, and examines state banks under his or her jurisdiction, which would be in addition to the authority of the Federal Reserve Board as fixed by the laws of the United States. The commissioner is authorized, directed, and required to promulgate, with precision, rules and regulations and investment procedures in the regulation, examination, and control of bank holding companies that control a bank chartered by the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-207.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 168, § 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 17; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-16/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 13/HB 143; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 17/HB 891.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “an annual basis” for “On July 1, 1976, and annually thereafter on dates established by the commissioner” in subsection (a).

7-1-608.
Bank holding companies — Lawful and unlawful acquisitions, formations, and mergers; waivers.

It shall be unlawful for a bank holding company to acquire direct or indirect ownership or control of any voting shares of any bank, including any federal savings and loan association or federal savings bank, if, after such acquisition, such bank holding company will directly or indirectly own or control 5 percent or more of the voting shares of such bank, or for any company to become a bank holding company as a result of the acquisition of control of such bank, unless:

The bank being acquired is either a “bank” for the purposes of the federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended (12 U.S.C. Section 1841), or a “savings and loan,” a “state savings and loan,” a “savings bank,” or a “federal savings bank” whose deposits are insured under a federal deposit insurance program; and

Such bank of the type described in paragraph (1) of this subsection has been in existence and continuously operating or incorporated as a bank for a period of three years or more prior to the date of acquisition.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this Code section, the following activities are permitted. These activities regarding acquisitions by purchase and by formation are to be considered exceptions to the three-year age requirement contained in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section:

A bank holding company may acquire all or substantially all of the shares of a bank or trust company organized solely for the purpose of facilitating the acquisition of a federal or state chartered bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or other corporation doing a banking business in this state or the trust department of such institutions, which has been in existence and continuously operating or incorporated as such an institution or exercising trust powers for the minimum period prescribed in subsection (a) of this Code section;

A company may become a bank holding company by virtue of acquiring control of a bank if neither the company nor any other company controlled by or controlling such company controls any other bank domiciled in this state or elsewhere;

A bank holding company may acquire control through formation of a de novo bank in Georgia, provided that departmental approval and any required federal approvals are obtained; and

A de novo bank established or formed pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection shall be subject to the three-year age requirement contained in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section. A bank holding company may, however, merge or consolidate a de novo bank which may be less than three years old and that is established pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection into another bank owned by that holding company.

The department may waive the application of the three-year age requirement in the case of a bank that has been found by federal or state regulators to be:

Insolvent or in an unsafe or unsound condition to transact its business;

In a condition where it has generally suspended payment of its obligations without authority of law; or

Under any plan, order, or agreement of any kind with the FDIC under Section 12, 13, or 38 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 1811, et seq., as amended.

The commissioner may waive the three-year age requirement contained in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section if the commissioner determines that the proposed acquisition will result in material improvement of the safety and soundness of an institution that is in less than satisfactory condition at the time of the proposed acquisition. No such waiver will be authorized unless the commissioner determines that the proposed acquisition will not present undue safety and soundness risks to the financial institutions involved. In making such determination, the commissioner shall consider the financial condition and regulatory safety and soundness ratings of the institutions affected and the ability of management to administer and supervise the resulting institution.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-207.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 168, § 5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1081, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1008, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 15; Ga. L. 1985, p. 246, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1586, § 10; Ga. L. 1993, p. 917, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 11; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 17; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 14; Ga. L. 2002, p. 670, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 15/SB 70; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 14/HB 184; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-4/HB 811; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 17/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (b)(3) for the former provisions, which read: “A bank holding company registered with the department and lawfully owning a bank or a branch of a bank which was formed by the acquisition and subsequent merger of or share exchange with a Georgia bank, which bank or branch does a lawful banking business in this state, may acquire control through formation of a de novo bank in Georgia, provided that departmental approval and any required federal approvals are obtained. No out-of-state bank holding company may enter Georgia to do a banking business by formation of a de novo bank; and”.

Law reviews.

For article discussing compliance with Federal Securities Act of 1933 in bank acquisitions and the issuance of securities of bank holding companies, see 14 Ga. St. B.J. 114 (1978).